Louisiana, session 2026, HB55.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 794.1 is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 794.1. Disclosure of juror information
A.(1) The identity, name, address, telephone number, email address, image,
or likeness of a juror shall not be a public record unless released pursuant to
Paragraph B of this Article.
(2) The provisions of Subparagraph (1) of this Paragraph shall not apply if
a list of jurors is submitted to a local government.
B. Upon motion by any person and finding of good cause by the court,
information collected by the court or by a prosecuting attorney during the jury
selection process about a person who serves as a juror, including the juror's name,
home address, or other identifying information, may be disclosed in whole or in part
as the court deems necessary.
C. Whoever intentionally violates the provisions of Paragraph A of this
Article shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars, or imprisoned for not more
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 55 ENROLLED
than six months, or both. The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to a public
body.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(39) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(39) Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 103, 234, 794.1, 877, 894, Title
XXXIV of the Code of Criminal Procedure comprised of Articles 971 through 995,
Title XXXV of the Code of Criminal Procedure comprised of Articles 1001 through
1004
* * *
Section 3. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 794.1, enacted by Section 1 of this
Act, shall have prospective application only.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.